Massachusetts, session 194th, H5471.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the local licensing authority in a city or town which votes to
authorize the granting of licenses for the sale of an alcoholic beverage may, on a temporary basis
not to begin prior to June 8, 2026, allow an establishment licensed to sell alcoholic beverages,
wine or malt beverages pursuant to Section 12 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws to sell
alcoholic beverages, wine or malt beverages for off-premises consumption in social consumption
districts established pursuant to Section 3 of this Act. Only licensees located within a designated
district as defined in Section 3 of this Act may sell alcoholic beverages to be consumed within
said district.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other general or
special law to the contrary, an establishment licensed to sell alcoholic beverages pursuant to
Section 12 of Chapter 138 may, subject to approval of the local licensing authority, sell alcoholic
beverages or wine or malt beverages on-premises for one additional hour beyond the time set
of 2

forth in the establishment’s license, but not to exceed 3:00 a.m. for the period of June 8, 2026
until July 31, 2026 subject to any applicable local rules or regulations and any conditions placed
upon their license.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other general or
special law to the contrary, a city or town may elect to designate one or more areas in that city or
town in which alcoholic beverages are permitted to be consumed in public spaces, subject to
such restrictions as the city or town may deem appropriate and only for the period of June 8,
2026 until July 31, 2026. Alcohol consumed within a designated district shall be limited to
alcoholic beverages sold by participating licensees located within the designated district.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage and shall expire on July 31, 2026.
of 2